Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1,114
Implied credit agreement; limitations.

A credit agreement shall not be implied under any circumstances from (1) the relationship, fiduciary or otherwise, of the creditor and the debtor, (2) the rendering of financial advice by a creditor to a debtor, or (3) consultation by a creditor with a debtor.

Laws 1989, LB 606, § 3;

Laws 1990, LB 1199, § 3.